en: NPOP-NAB-0032
xx: NPOP-NAB-0032

en: NPOP-NAB-0033
xx: NPOP-NAB-0033

en: NPOP-NAB-0034
xx: NPOP-NAB-0034

en: NPOP-NAB-0035
xx: NPOP-NAB-0035

en: NPOP-NAB-0036
xx: NPOP-NAB-0036

en: NPOP-NAB-0037
xx: NPOP-NAB-0037

en: NPOP-NAB-0038
xx: NPOP-NAB-0038

en: NPOP-NAB-0039
xx: NPOP-NAB-0039

en: NPOP-NAB-0040
xx: NPOP-NAB-0040

en: NPOP-NAB-0041
xx: NPOP-NAB-0041

en: EU Organic, European Organic, European leaf, European organic leaf, EU organic farming
xx: EU Organic
bg: ЕС Био, Европейско био, Европейско лого, Европейско био лого, ЕС био земеделие
ca: Orgànic UE
cs: EU bio
da: EU-økologisk
de: EU-Öko-Verordnung, Europäische Öko-Verordnung, EU Ökologische
el: Βιολογικός ΕΕ, Ευρωπαϊκός Βιολογικός, Ευρωπαϊκό φύλλο, Ευρωπαϊκό βιολογικό φύλλο, ΕΕ βιολογική γεωργία
es: Ecológico UE, Ecológico U.E., Producto ecológico europeo
et: EL-ökoloogiline, Euroopa ökoloogiline, Euroopa leht, Euroopa ökoloogiline leht, EL ökoloogiline põllumajandus
fi: EU Luomu, EU:n luomu, Euroopan luomu, Euroopan lehti, Euroopan luomulehti
fr: Bio européen, Label bio européen, bio ce, bio europe, Eurofeuille, Euro-Feuille, Feuille bio
he: אורגני בתקן אירופאי
hu: EU Organic, EU bio, EU öko
it: Biologico UE, Biologico EU
ja: EUオーガニック, ヨーロッパオーガニック, ヨーロッパの葉, ヨーロッパのオーガニック葉, EUオーガニック農業
ko: EU 유기농, 유럽 유기농, 유럽 잎, 유럽 유기농 잎, EU 유기농 농업
lt: ES ekologiškas, Europos ekologiškas, europinis lapas, Europos ekologiškas lapas, ES ekologinis ūkininkavimas
nb: EU-økologisk, Europeisk økologisk, Europeisk blad, Europeisk økologisk blad, EU økologisk landbruk
pl: EU Organic, Europejski Organic, Europejski liść, Europejski organiczny liść, EU organiczne rolnictwo
pt: Orgânico EU, Orgânico Europeu, Folha Europeia, Folha Orgânica Europeia
ro: Organic UE, Organic european, Frunză europeană, Frunză organică europeană, Agricultură organică UE
ru: ЕС Органический, Европейский органический, Европейский лист, Европейский органический лист, ЕС органическое земледелие
sv: EU-ekologisk
tr: AB Organik, Avrupa Organik, Avrupa yaprağı, Avrupa organik yaprağı, AB organik tarım
uk: ЄС Органічний, Європейський органічний, Європейський лист, Європейський органічний лист, ЄС органічне сільське господарство
vi: Hữu cơ EU, Hữu cơ Châu Âu, Lá Châu Âu, Lá hữu cơ Châu Âu, Nông nghiệp hữu cơ EU
zh: 欧盟有机

de: EG-Öko-Verordnung, Deutsches Bio-Siegel, Deutsches staatliches Bio-Siegel, Bio-Siegel, eg oko verordnung
xx: EG-Öko-Verordnung, eg oko verordnung

en: non-EU Agriculture
bg: Земеделие извън ЕС
ca: Agricultura No-UE
cs: Zemědělství mimo EU
da: ikke-EU jordbruk
de: Nicht EU-Landwirtschaft
es: Agricultura no UE
fi: tuotettu EU:n ulkopuolella
fr: Agriculture non UE
he: חקלאות מחוץ לאיחוד האירופי
hr: poljoprivreda izvan EU
hu: nem-EU mezőgazdaság
it: Agricoltura non-UE, Agricoltura non-EU
nl: Non EU landbouw, niet-EU landbouw
pt: Agricultura não-UE, Agricultura não União Europeia
ru: не-EU агрокультура
sv: icke EU-jordbruk

en: EU Agriculture, European Union agriculture
bg: Земеделие от ЕС
ca: Agricultura UE
cs: Zemědělství EU
de: EU-Landwirtschaft
es: Agricultura UE, Agricultura Unión Europea, Agricultura de la UE
fi: tuotettu EU:ssa
fr: Agriculture UE, Agriculture Union Européeenne
he: חקלאות האיחוד האירופי
hr: EU poljoprivreda
hu: EU mezőgazdaság
it: Agricoltura UE, Agricoltura EU, Agricoltura dell'Unione Europea
lt: ES žemės ūkis, Europos Sąjungos žemės ūkis
nl: EU landbouw
pt: Agricultura UE, Agricultura da União Europeia
ru: EU агрокультура, агрокультура Европейского Союза
sv: EU-jordbruk

en: French agriculture
de: Französische Landwirtschaft
es: Agricultura francesa
fr: Agriculture France
it: Agricoltura francese
nl: Franse landbouw
pt: Agricultura francesa

en: EU/non-EU Agriculture, EU and non EU Agriculture
bg: Земеделие от/извън ЕС
ca: Procedent d'agricultura UE/no UE, Agricultura UE/no UE
cs: Zemědělství EU a mimo EU
de: EU-/Nicht-EU-Landwirtschaft
es: Agricultura UE/no UE
fi: Tuotettu EU:ssa ja EU:n ulkopuolella
fr: Agriculture UE/Non UE
hu: EU/nem-EU mezőgazdaság
it: Agricoltura UE/non-UE, Agricoltura EU/non-EU
lt: ES / ne ES žemės ūkis, ES ir ne ES žemės ūkis
nl: EU/Non EU landbouw
pt: Agricultura EU/não EU, Agricultura da União Europeia EU/não União Europeia
ru: EU/не-EU агрокультура

en: Bio Austria
xx: Bio Austria

en: Austria Bio Garantie
xx: Austria Bio Garantie

en: Biogarantie
xx: Biogarantie

en: Biogarantie BEL, Biogarantie Made in Belgium
xx: Biogarantie BEL, Biogarantie Made in Belgium